Utah statutes.
63B-17-301.   Authorizations to construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Section 63A-5-206, use clinical fees and donations to plan, design, and construct a neuropsychiatric institute expansion;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(2)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to the requirements of Section 63A-5-206, use donations to plan, design, and construct an arboretum visitor center addition;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(3)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to the requirements of Section 63A-5-206, use donations to plan, design, and construct a business building addition;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(4)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to the requirements of Section 63A-5-206, use donations to plan, design, and construct a Vernal entrepreneurship and energy research center;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(5)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to the requirements of Section 63A-5-206, use research grants and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a hydraulics laboratory addition to the water laboratory;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(6)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah State University may, subject to the requirements of Section 63A-5-206, use insurance claim funds and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a structures laboratory enclosure;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(7)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah Valley University may, subject to the requirements of Section 63A-5-206, use donations to plan, design, and construct a children's theater;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(8)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Southern Utah University may, subject to the requirements of Section 63A-5-206, use donations to plan and design a science center addition;

(b)  this authorization and the existence of plans and designs do not guarantee nor improve the chances for legislative approval of the remainder of the building in any subsequent year; and

(c)  no state funds be used for any portion of this planning and design.

